Utah statutes.
53A-15-1008.   Review by legislative auditor general.

(1)  The legislative auditor general shall conduct a performance audit of the Electronic High School as directed by the Legislative Audit Subcommittee.

(2)  In conducting the performance audit of the Electronic High School, the legislative auditor general shall develop performance metrics using factors such as:

(a)  course completion rate;

(b)  number of credits earned; and

(c)  cost of providing online courses.

(3)  The legislative auditor general shall use the performance metrics developed under Subsection (2) to evaluate the Electronic High School in comparison with other online programs.

